Oklahoma, session 2026, SB217.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3311.19 of Title 70, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The Council on Law Enforcement Education and Training


(CLEET) shall establish and develop a five-year pilot program called


the Mental Health Response Pilot Program. The purpose of the pilot


program is to provide licensed mental health professionals


throughout this state with CLEET certification to aid law


enforcement response to individuals with mental health crises.



Req. No. 905 Page 1


B. Licensed mental health professionals who receive CLEET


certification shall be added to law enforcement agencies determined


by CLEET in the following manner:


1. Fifteen such professionals to two agencies that serve a


population greater than three hundred thousand (300,000);


2. Six such professionals to two agencies that serve a


population greater than twenty-five thousand (25,000) but less than


three hundred thousand (300,000); and


3. One such professional to two county sheriffs’ offices that


do not have a professional pursuant to paragraphs 1 and 2 of this


subsection.


C. The Council on Law Enforcement Education and Training shall


promulgate rules to administer the provisions of this section.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3311.20 of Title 70, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving fund


for the Council on Law Enforcement Education and Training (CLEET) to


be designated the “Mental Health Response Pilot Program Revolving


Fund”. The fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal


year limitations, and shall consist of all monies received by the


Council on Law Enforcement Education and Training from


appropriations, donations, grants, or other sources of funding


provided for the purpose of providing licensed mental health

Req. No. 905 Page 2


professionals with CLEET certification to aid law enforcement


response to individuals with mental health crises. All monies


accruing to the credit of the fund are hereby appropriated and may


be budgeted and expended by the Council on Law Enforcement Education


and Training for the purpose provided for in this Section 1 of this


act. Expenditures from the fund shall be made upon warrants issued


by the State Treasurer against claims filed as prescribed by law


with the Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise


Services for approval and payment.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-905 CN 12/30/2024 4:47:19 PM

























Req. No. 905 Page 3